Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1521.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1(a) and (b) of the act of June 28, 1935 (P.L.477, No.193), referred to as the Enforcement Officer Disability Benefits Law, are amended to read:Section 1. (a) Be it enacted, &c., That:(1) any member of the State Police Force;(2) any enforcement officer or investigator employed by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board;(3) the parole agents employed by the Department of Corrections;(3.1) probation officers employed by a participating county;1234567891011121314151617181920 (4) Capitol Police officers;(4.1) campus police officers employed by a participating university;(5) correction employes employed by the Department of Corrections, whose principal duty is the care, custody and control of inmates;(5.1) commissioned police officers employed by the Department of Corrections, Bureau of Investigations and Intelligence;(6) psychiatric security aides employed by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections, whose principal duty is the care, custody, and control of the criminally insane;(7) drug enforcement agents of the Office of Attorney General whose principal duty is the enforcement of the drug laws of the Commonwealth;(8) special agents of the Office of Attorney General whose principal duty is the enforcement of the criminal laws of the Commonwealth;(9) any member of the Delaware River Port Authority Police;(10) any policeman, fireman or park guard of any county, city, borough, town or township;(10.1) firemen employed by the Commonwealth;(11) any sheriff or deputy sheriff;(12) any enforcement officer or investigator of the Pennsylvania Game Commission or the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission;(13) DCNR Rangers, DCNR Ranger Supervisors, DCNR Ranger Operations Specialists, DCNR Ranger Trainees and State Park Officers employed by the Department of Conservation and Natural 20250HB1521PN1780 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Resources;(14) members of the Fort Indiantown Gap Police;(15) enforcement officers, as defined in 71 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions), who are employed by the Office of State Inspector General and whose principal duties include the enforcement of the provisions specified in section 506-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929";(16) transit police officers employed by a participating transit or port authority;(17) members of the Allegheny County Housing Authority Police;(18) housing police officers employed by a participating housing authority; [or](19) corrections officers or jail guards employed by a participating county and whose principal duty is the care, custody and control of inmates; or(20) public works employes;who is injured in the performance of his duties including, in the case of firemen, duty as special fire police, and by reason thereof is temporarily incapacitated from performing his duties, shall be paid by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania if an employe identified under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (5.1), (6), (7), (8), (12), (13), (14) [or], (15) or (20) or by the Delaware River Port Authority if a member of the Delaware River Port Authority Police or by the participating university if a campus police officer or by a participating transit or port authority if a transit police officer or by the Allegheny County Housing Authority if a member of the Allegheny County Housing Authority Police or by a participating housing authority if a housing 20250HB1521PN1780 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 police officer or by the county, township or municipality, by which he is employed, his full rate of salary, as fixed by ordinance or resolution, until the disability arising therefrom has ceased. All medical and hospital bills, incurred in connection with any such injury, shall be paid by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or by the Delaware River Port Authority or by the participating university or by the participating transit or port authority or by the Allegheny County Housing Authority or by the participating housing authority or by such county, city, township or municipality. During the time salary for temporary incapacity shall be paid by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or by the Delaware River Port Authority or by the participating university or by the participating transit or port authority or by the Allegheny County Housing Authority or by the participating housing authority or by the county, city, borough, town or township, any workmen's compensation, received or collected by any such employe for such period, shall be turned over to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or to the Delaware River Port Authority or to the participating university or to the participating transit or port authority or to the Allegheny County Housing Authority or to the participating housing authority or to such county, city, borough, town or township, and paid into the treasury thereof, and if such payment shall not be so made by the employe the amount so due the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, the Delaware River Port Authority or the participating university or the participating transit or port authority or the Allegheny County Housing Authority or the participating housing authority or the county, city, borough, town or township shall be deducted from any salary then or 20250HB1521PN1780 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereafter becoming due and owing.(b) In the case of:(1) the State Police Force;(2) enforcement officers and investigators employed by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board;(3) the parole agents employed by the Department of Corrections;(3.1) probation officers employed by a participating county;(4) Capitol Police officers;(4.1) campus police officers employed by a participating university;(5) correction employes employed by the Department of Corrections, whose principal duty is the care, custody and control of inmates;(5.1) commissioned police officers employed by the Department of Corrections, Bureau of Investigations and Intelligence;(6) psychiatric security aides employed by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections whose principal duty is the care, custody, and control of the criminally insane;(7) drug enforcement agents of the Office of Attorney General whose principal duty is the enforcement of the drug laws of the Commonwealth;(8) special agents of the Office of Attorney General whose principal duty is the enforcement of the criminal laws of the Commonwealth;(9) members of the Delaware River Port Authority Police;(10) salaried policemen and firemen;(10.1) firemen employed by the Commonwealth;(11) sheriffs and deputy sheriffs;20250HB1521PN1780 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) enforcement officers and investigators of the Pennsylvania Game Commission and the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission;(13) DCNR Rangers, DCNR Ranger Supervisors, DCNR Ranger Operations Specialists, DCNR Ranger Trainees and State Park Officers employed by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources;(14) members of the Fort Indiantown Gap Police;(15) enforcement officers, as defined in 71 Pa.C.S. § 5102, who are employed by the Office of State Inspector General and whose principal duties include the enforcement of the provisions specified in section 506-A of "The Administrative Code of 1929";(16) transit police officers employed by a participating transit or port authority;(17) members of the Allegheny County Housing Authority Police;(18) housing police officers employed by a participating housing authority; [and](19) corrections officers or jail guards employed by a participating county and whose principal duty is the care, custody and control of inmates; and(20) public works employes;who have served for four consecutive years or longer, diseases of the heart and tuberculosis of the respiratory system, contracted or incurred by any of them after four years of continuous service as such, and caused by extreme overexertion in times of stress or danger or by exposure to heat, smoke, fumes or gases, arising directly out of the employment shall be compensable in accordance with the terms hereof; and unless any such disability shall be compensable under the compensation laws 20250HB1521PN1780 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as having been caused by accidental injury, such disability shall be compensable as occupational disease disabilities are presently compensable under the compensation laws of this Commonwealth. It shall be presumed that tuberculosis of the respiratory system contracted or incurred after four consecutive years of service was contracted or incurred as a direct result of employment.* * *Section 2. Section 2.1 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2.1. For the purposes of this act, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * * "Public work." Construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair work other than maintenance work, done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of the funds of a public body where the estimated cost of the total project is in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), but shall not include work performed under a rehabilitation or manpower training program."Public works contractor." A contractor that provides work under a contract involving a public work."Public works employe." An individual hired by a public works contractor or subcontractor for whom the public works contractor or subcontractor is required by Federal law to file a Form W-2 with the Internal Revenue Service."Subcontractor." A person, other than a natural person, regardless of its tier, including, but not limited to, a staffing agency that performs work for a public works contractor 20250HB1521PN1780 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under a contract for a public work. The term does not include persons that are material suppliers for a project.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1521PN1780 - 8 - 123